apertium-hyw.hyw.twol
Alphabet 
 ա  ե է ը ո օ ի լ
բ գ դ զ թ ժ  խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ
 Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի Լ
Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ
%{յ%}:յ !stable glide that cant be deleted at end of words

՚		!apostrophe

՜:՜		!punctuation from the infixial file that's added to every word
՞:՞
՛:՛
%{՜%}:՜   ! irregular punctuation inside lexical entries
%{՞%}:՞
%{՛%}:՛



!other punctuation symbols
%-
֊ 
– 
 — 
, 
՝
։
.
'
 «
»
%(
%)
՚
՟
…    
ՙ    

% 
%{G1%}:ը %{G2%}:%  
%{ThAյ%}:0
%{լ%}:լ

%{ProhPl%}:0 %{ImpSg%}:0 %{Aor%}:0 %{Impf%}:0 %{Pres3SG%}:0 %{Pres2PL%}:0

%{PossPlի%}:ի  ! The plural possessive generally surfaces with ի unless before a vowel

%{SpurPlե%}:0  ! Spurious plural is deleted unless after monosyllables
%{SpurPlր%}:0 

%{defն%}:ը    ! for definite allomorphy ն-ը; i assume easier default is ը
%{Plն%}:ն		!for plural allomorphy եր ներ; I assume easier default is polysyllabic ներ

%{Ninfl%}:0  ! Boundary between noun and inflection
%{NinflRed%}:0 ! Boundary between noun and inflection, for obligatory reduction
%{NinflRedForcedNer%}:0  ! Boundary between noun and -ner suffix, obligatory reduction in some lexemes
%{mono%}:0     ! This is boundary before a monosyllabic root to trigger the right plural
;

Sets

InfixPunctAdded = ՜ ՞ ՛ ; 
InfixPunctLexical = %{՜%}  %{՞%} %{՛%} ;
Vowel = 	ա  ե է ը ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի  
		;
NonSchwaVowel = ա  ե է ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է  Ո Օ Ի  
		;
Cons = բ գ դ զ թ ժ  լ խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ  
       Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Լ Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ 
       ; 

!Noun-infl boundaries
GeneralNInflBoundary = %{Ninfl%} %{NinflRed%} ;

!Summary of contexts ե theme vowel becomes է    
JeToE = %{ProhPl%} %{Pres3SG%} %{ImpSg%} %{Impf%}  %{Pres2PL%}
;

! Some  contexts where ի theme vowel becomes է   
IToE = %{ImpSg%} %{Impf%} 
;


! Some   contexts where ի theme vowel becomes ե   
IToJe = %{Aor%}
;

! Summary of contexts where ա  theme vowel becomes այ
AtoAJ = %{Pres3SG%}
;
 
 Definitions


FullVowel = [ :ա | :ե | :է |  :ո | :օ | :ի | :ո :ւ | 
			 :Ա | :Ե | :Է |  :Ո | :Օ | :Ի | :Ո :Ւ ]
			;

RealVowel = [ FullVowel | :ը | :Ը   ];

RealVowelUR = [ ա: | ե: | է: |  ո: | օ: | ի: | ո: ւ: | ը: |
			Ա: | Ե: | Է: |  Ո: | Օ: | Ի: | Ո: Ւ: | Ը:]  
			;

! For finding monosyllables, I have to specify monosyllabic words with schwa
! because of conflicts with vowel reduction
! Also has to reference underlyng segments because of conflicts with other rules
MonosyllableWithoutSchwa =  .#.  (Cons:  (յ:))	RealVowelUR  (Cons:  (Cons:))   (ք:)   ;
MonosyllableWithSchwa  =  .#. Cons: (Cons:) (Cons:)  ; 
Monosyllable =   [ MonosyllableWithoutSchwa | MonosyllableSchwa ];
;
 

Rules


!!!!! AFFIX ALLOMORPHY 
!Indicative prefix /կ{G1}{G2}/ is [կը ] before C's and [կ'] before V's
!Complication is that ու is a vowel while ոX is not

"For G1, prefix կ{G1}{G2} to [կ՚] before a vowel"
%{G1%}:՚ <=> _ %{G2%}:     [ [ :Vowel - :ո ] | :ո :ւ ] ;  
"For G2, prefix կ{G1}{G2} to կ՚ before a vowel"
%{G2%}:0   <=>   _   [ [ :Vowel - :ո ] | :ո :ւ  ] ;  

!"For G1, prefix կ{G1}{G2} to [կը ] before a consonant"
!%{G1%}:ը <=> _ %{G2%}:    [ [ :Cons ] | [ :ո - [ :ո :ւ ] ] ] ;  
!"For G2, prefix կ{G1}{G2} to [կը ] before a consonant"
!%{G2%}:%    <=>   _   [ [ :Cons ] | [ :ո - [ :ո :ւ ] ] ] ;  


!!!! GLIDE EPENTHESIS
!The glide յ is added between the ա theme vowel and pres3sg + imperfective-i
"The glide յ between the ա theme vowel and before 3sg: /ա{ThAյ}Pres/ -> [այ]"
%{ThAյ%}:յ <=> ա: _   [  %{Pres3SG%}:  |    %{Impf%}: :ի ]   ;


!!! Imperative exclamation point
!Some irregular verbs have a C-final imperative, but the exlamation mark is inside the verb
!This will metathesize the exclamation mark in this context
!It only works for verbs like բերել -- the very լալ has a cheat in the lexd
!"delete the exclamation mark when it follows a consonant"
!՛:0 <=> :Cons _ .#. ;
!"add an exclamation mark after an irregular imperative verb's final vowel"
!0:՛ <=> FullVowel _ :Cons* :Cons  ՛:0 .#. ;

!!! Infixal punctuation
!The lexd file adds an infixal punctuation at end of every word
!This marker must metathesize into the rightmost full vowel (=stressed vowel) in regular cases irregular verbs have a C-final imperative, but the exlamation mark is inside the verb
"delete the exclamation mark when it follows a consonant"
՛:0 <=> (:Cons|:ը) :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize exclamation mark"
0:՛ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _ :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՛:0 .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"delete the question mark when it follows a consonant"
՞:0 <=>  (:Cons|:ը) :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize question mark"
0:՞ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _  :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՞:0  .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"delete the vocative mark when it follows a consonant"
՜:0 <=>  (:Cons|:ը)  :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize vocative mark"
0:՜ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _  :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՜:0  .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"deleted added punctuation if the word already has punctuation"
InfixPunctAdded:0 <=> InfixPunctLexical: :*  _   ;

"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՜%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՜%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՜%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՞%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՞%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՞%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՜%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՜%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՜%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;

!!!!! THEME VOWEL CHANGES
!In many contexts, the  ի theme vowel becomes է
! These contexts  are part of IToE
"theme vowel /իIToE/ to [է]"
ի:է  <=>   _  0:* IToE: ;

!!In many contexts, the  ե theme vowel becomes է
! These contexts  are part of JeToE
"theme vowel /ե{JeToE}/ to [է]"
ե:է  <=>   _ 0:* JeToE: ;


!In some contexts, the ի theme vowel becomes ե
! These contexts  are part of IToJe
"theme vowel /իIToJe}/ to [ե]"
ի:ե  <=>   _  0:* IToJe: ;

!When there's a full vowel after the infinitival, the ի theme vowel becomes ե
!Needed finessing in order to apply across zero morphs and consonants liek նի
"theme vowel /ի{լ}V/ to [ե]"
ի:ե  <=>   _  %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;

!When there's a full vowel after the infinitival, the ու theme vowel becomes ե
"theme vowel /ու/ to [ե]"
ո:ե  <=>   _ ւ:0 %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;
"theme vowel /ու/ to [ե]"
ւ:0  <=>   _ %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Noun allomorphy

! For definite allomorphy, the input definite suffix is %{defն%} 
! It's a   ն after/before vowels, ը elsewhere
! Need the :0* context because of deleted glides
! Need the ու line because of infixal punctuation creating *բո՝ւը
"definite suffix is ն after/before vowels"
%{defն%}:ն <=>   RealVowel  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _ ;
 				:ո  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ւ _ ;
				_ (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* RealVowel ;
 				_  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ո   (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ւ  ;
				
				
! For plural allomorphy, the input plural suffix is %{Plն%}եր
! The rule will drop %{Plն%} after monosyllables, defined roughty as maximally CJVCCk
!The suffix is -er also after monosyllabic-headed compounds
!I assume that the right compounds end in a {mono} diacritic
"plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and after monosyllabic-headed compounds"
%{Plն%}:0 <=> Monosyllable :0*  _ ;
				%{mono%}: :0*  _ ;

! For plural possessive allomorphy, there is a fake plural suffix եր if after monosyllable
! The rule will turn the relevant diacritics into the plural suffix
!Same for compounds with monosyllabic head
"spurious plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and mono-head compounds: for ե"
%{SpurPlե%}:ե <=> Monosyllable  :0*  _ ;
				%{mono%}:  :0*  _ ;
"spurious plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and mono-head compounds: for ր"
%{SpurPlր%}:ր  <=> Monosyllable  :0*  %{SpurPlե%}:ե _ ;
				%{mono%}:  :0*  %{SpurPlե%}:ե _ ;

! For plural possessive allomorphy, the suffix loses ի before a vowel
"Delete the vowel ի of the plural possessive before a vowel է ո ի " 
%{PossPlի%}:0  <=>  _ [:է | :ո | :ի ];



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! Destressed reduction
! In nouns, if the last stem vowel is ի or ու, then it is deleted in the orthography if
! It precedes a vowel-initial inflectional suffix
! I capture that by using a morpheme boundary %{NinflRed%} that's only found
! between nouns and inflection for reduction
"Delete ի if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them; can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ի:0 <=> _ :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ; 
		_ :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 
"Delete ու  if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them (part 1); can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ո:0 <=> _ ւ: :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ;
		_ ւ: :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 
"Delete ու  if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them (part 2); can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ւ:0 <=> ո: _  :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ;
		ո: _  :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 


!!!!!!!!!
!! glide deletion in nouns
! The glide յ is deleted when a) it follows ա or ո, b) it's before nominal suffixes
! and c) the suffix is consonantal-initial
! But not for monosyllabic nouns
! It's deleted before definite suffix
"Delete glide յ  in the context ա/ո _ C-initial suffix "
յ:0 <=>  :ա (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  :Cons ;
        :ա (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* %{defն%}: ;
		:ո (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  :Cons ;
        :ո (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  %{defն%}: ;
		except
   	    	Monosyllable (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*	_  ;
   	    	 	_ (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* %{mono%}: ;

!! glide epenthesis in nouns
! The glide յ is added when a) it follows ա , b) it's before nominal suffixes
! and c) the suffix is vowel-initial
! It's absent before definite suffix
"Insert glide յ  in the context ա _ V-initial suffix "
0:յ <=>  :ա _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* RealVowelUR ;
	!	except
   	 !   	Monosyllable :0*	_  ; !not sure if this except clause does anything
   	   ! 	%{mono%}: :0*	_  ; 
   	    	
!        :ա _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* %{defն%}: ;
   	 
! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
